analyzer/analyzer.xfst
! analyzer.xfst
!
! This is the main source file for our analyzer.
! Use the command 'source analyzer.xfst' from the hfst-xfst or foma
! command line to work with the result interactively.
!
! You can also save the active FST in a number of formats.
! For this exercise we will use 'write att' command to save our
! final analyzer as a AT&T-formatted FST file.
!
! We define the morphotactics and the orthographic/phonological
! alternations here.
!

! read regular noun stems
read lexc noun.lexc
define NounStem

! read irregular noun stems
read lexc noun-irreg.lexc
define NounIrreg

!
! Define number agreement markers for nouns
! Note that this is somewhat different than in-class demonstration.
! Here, we insert an intermediate symbol "<s>" for plural, and we will 
! deal with the phonological/orthographic alternations separately,
! rewriting the intermediate symbol "<s>" based on its context.
!
define NounNumber "<PL>":"<s>"|"<SG>":0;
define Nouns NounStem "<N>" NounNumber | NounIrreg;

!
! Insert an "e" before the intermediate symbol "<s>" if it follows
! "x", "ch" and "sh". Note that this is only
! a partial list of contexts where e-insertion occurs. Exercise 1 is about extending this
! list to cover other contexts where other e-insertion happens.
!

define eInsertion [..] -> e || [x | {ch} | {sh}] "<N>" _ "<s>";

!
! Exercise 2: implementing y replacement so that your analyzer
! analyzes words like 'butterfly' correctly.
! Insert "e" before the intermediate symbol "<s>" if it follows
! a "y", which will be replaced by "i". If there is a vowel before y, then no need to insert "e".

define yReplacement  y -> i e || \[a|e|i|o|u] _ "<N>" "<s>";

define ReplaceIntermediate "<s>" -> s ,, "<N>" -> 0;

define analyzer Nouns .o. eInsertion .o. yReplacement .o. ReplaceIntermediate;

regex analyzer;
